District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.03

Application of subchapter I of this chapter.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided, §§ 31-3931.03, 31-3931.04, 31-3931.05, 31-3931.09, 31-3931.10, 31-3931.11, 31-3931.12, 31-3931.13, 31-3931.14, 31-3931.15, 31-3931.16, 31-3931.17, 31-3931.18, 31-3931.19, 31-3931.20, 31-3931.21, and 31-3931.09 through 31-3931.22 shall apply under this subchapter to SPFCs.

(b)

The Commissioner, by rule or order, may exempt an SPFC, on a case-by-case basis, from the provisions of this title that the Commissioner determines to be inappropriate given the nature of the risks to be insured.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 203
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 165(a), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a).